incubator/apertium-ku-fa.ku.dix
    <pardef n="wel/at__n">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>at</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>êt</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>atê</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ato</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>atek</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>atekî</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>atekî</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>at</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>atan</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>atên</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>atên</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>atin</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>atinan</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>atine</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 


      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>atî</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>atan</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="mirov__n">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ê</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>o</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ek</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ekî</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ekî</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>an</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ên</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ên</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>inan</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ine</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 


      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>î</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>an</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="piran/î__n">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>î</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyê</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iya</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyê</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyek</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyekê</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyeke</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>î</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyên</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyan</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyên</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyin</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyinan</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyine</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyê</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyan</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

    </pardef>

    <e lm="karker"><i>karker</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="heval"><i>heval</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="xiyar"><i>xiyar</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bav"><i>bav</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bel"><i>bel</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hogir"><i>hogir</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="xwêndekar"><i>xwêndekar</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ziman"><i>ziman</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="şagirt"><i>şagirt</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="welat"><i>wel</i><par n="wel/at__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alikarî"><i>alikar</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arîkarî"><i>arîkar</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aşitî"><i>aşit</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bajarvanî"><i>bajarvan</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bêmirinî"><i>bêmirin</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bîhinfirehî"><i>bîhinfireh</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="çarşî"><i>çarş</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cudatî"><i>cudat</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="derzî"><i>derz</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dezî"><i>dez</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dînîtî"><i>dînît</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="duwahî"><i>duwah</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="endustrî"><i>endustr</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ewlehî"><i>ewleh</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hindikayî"><i>hindikay</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="keyatî"><i>keyat</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meznahî"><i>meznah</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="netewayetî"><i>netewayet</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pêşwazî"><i>pêşwaz</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="qoxî"><i>qox</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="serborî"><i>serbor</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spehîtî"><i>spehît</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="terapî"><i>terap</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wezîrtî"><i>wezîrt</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zaniyarî"><i>zaniyar</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="agahdarî"><i>agahdar</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="avahî"><i>avah</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="berevajî"><i>berevaj</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bêdengî"><i>bêdeng</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="demokrasî"><i>demokras</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dudilî"><i>dudil</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="girtîn"><i>girtîn</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kevneşopî"><i>kevneşop</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lehî"><i>leh</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="navdarî"><i>navdar</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pêşbazî"><i>pêşbaz</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rizgarî"><i>rizgar</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="serdestî"><i>serdest</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tarî"><i>tar</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tenêtî"><i>tenêt</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="welatperwerî"><i>welatperwer</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zelalî"><i>zelal</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="çepgirî"><i>çepgir</i><par n="piran/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alav"><i>alav</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bajar"><i>bajar</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bar"><i>bar</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bav"><i>bav</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bin"><i>bin</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="can"><i>can</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deng"><i>deng</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dest"><i>dest</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="devê"><i>devê</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dêm"><i>dêm</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="evraz"><i>evraz</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gel"><i>gel</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gund"><i>gund</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="heft"><i>heft</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hêstir"><i>hêstir</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kek"><i>kek</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kur"><i>kur</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lawik"><i>lawik</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leşker"><i>leşker</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mar"><i>mar</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mil"><i>mil</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="milyon"><i>milyon</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nan"><i>nan</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="neh"><i>neh</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pismam"><i>pismam</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pênc"><i>pênc</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="reng"><i>reng</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sed"><i>sed</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="temen"><i>temen</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="war"><i>war</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wext"><i>wext</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="xort"><i>xort</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="çav"><i>çav</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="çûk"><i>çûk</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="şeş"><i>şeş</i><par n="mirov__n"/></e>
